src/noun-kmr-morph.txt
LEXICON mirov__n

+N+Masc+Sg+Nom+Ind:%>ek # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl+Ind:%>ekî # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Con+Ind:%>ekî # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Nom+Def: # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl+Def: # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Con+Def:%>ê # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>o # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Nom+Ind:%>in # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl+Ind:%>inan # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Con+Ind:%>ine # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Nom+Def: # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl+Def:%>an # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Con+Def:%>ên # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ên # ;

LEXICON ba__n 

+N+Masc+Sg+Nom+Ind:%>yek # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl+Ind:%>yekî # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Con+Ind:%>yekî # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Nom+Def: # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl+Def: # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Con+Def:%>yê # ;
+N+Masc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>yo # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Nom+Ind:%>yin # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl+Ind:%>yinan # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Con+Ind:%>yine # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Nom+Def: # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl+Def:%>yan # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Con+Def:%>yên # ;
+N+Masc+Pl+Voc+Def:%>no # ;

LEXICON roj__n

+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Ind:%>ek # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl+Ind:%>ekê # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Con+Ind:%>eke # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl+Def:ê # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Con+Def:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ê # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Ind:%>in # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl+Ind:%>inan # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Con+Ind:%>ine # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl+Def:%>ên # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Con+Def:%>an # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ên # ;
